Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-2904
Violation.

It is a violation of the Employee Classification
Act for a contractor to designate an individual as an independent contractor
who would be properly classified as an employee under section 48-2903.

Laws 2010, LB563, § 4.